Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1711
Department of Administrative Services; Department of Transportation; project; procedures.

The Department of Administrative Services shall, with the advice of each agency, prescribe by administrative rules procedures for the determination of a project under its jurisdiction. The Department of Transportation shall prescribe such procedures for highway construction projects. Such procedures may include:

(1) Determination of a project which constitutes a grouping of minor construction, rehabilitation, or renovation activities; and

(2) Determination of a project which constitutes a grouping of substantially similar construction, rehabilitation, or renovation activities.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 11;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 289.